Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5924.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "commercial advertising loudness mitigation act". Sec. 3. As used in this act: (a) "Commercial advertisement" means material that advertises the commercial availability or quality of property, goods, or services. (b) "Person" means an individual or a partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association, governmental entity, or other legal entity. (c) "Video content" means audiovisual material that is not a commercial advertisement and that a video streaming service makes available for viewing by a consumer. (d) "Video programming" means that term as defined in 47 USC 613. (e) "Video streaming service" means, except as otherwise provided in subdivision (f), a person that makes available directly to a consumer in this state, through a distribution method that uses internet protocol, either of the following: (i) Video programming. (ii) Video content. (f) Video streaming service does not include a television broadcast station, cable operator, or other multichannel video programing distributor, or a person that serves video programming or video content without commercial advertisements. Sec. 5. Beginning July 1, 2027, a video streaming service shall not transmit the audio of a commercial advertisement louder than the video programming or video content that the commercial advertisement accompanies. Sec. 7. A video streaming service that violates this act is subject to a civil fine of not more than $10,000.00 for each violation. The attorney general may bring an action to collect the fine. A fine collected must be deposited in the general fund.